Hawaii statutes.
[§147-126] Fees and deposit of moneys. (a)
The department shall fix, assess, and collect fees for the inspection and
certification services provided under this part. The fees shall be as
established under cooperative agreement with the United States Department of
Agriculture or other government agencies or, if not applicable, as established
by rule under section 147-7. The department may also charge an amount
necessary to cover all costs of traveling expenses and extraordinary services
when the performance of the services involves unusual cost in their
performance.

(b) Except for fees collected by the
department pursuant to part VII, all fees and expenses collected by the
department pursuant to this part shall be deposited with the director of finance
to the credit of the general fund. [L 2003, c 49, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next